South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S565.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-29-120(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) On November eleventh of each year, schools mayshall permit students to attend activities to commemorate and honor veterans that are held at locations within their respective counties. The parent of a student seeking to be excused pursuant to this subsection shall provide prior written consent to the appropriate school personnel. Attendance at such activities shall count as a part of the instructional day for purposes of Section 59-1-440. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----